Washington statutes.
RCW 41.54.020

Benefits under prior retirement systems—Restoration of contributions.

(1) Those persons who are dual members on or after July 1, 1988, shall not receive a retirement benefit from any prior system while dual members without the loss of all benefits under this chapter. Retroactive retirement in any prior system will cancel membership in any subsequent systems except as allowed under RCW 41.04.270 and will result in the refund of all employee and employer contributions made to such systems.

(2) If a member has withdrawn contributions from a prior system, the member may restore the contributions, together with interest since the date of withdrawal as determined by the system, and recover the service represented by the contributions. Such restoration must be completed within two years of establishing dual membership or prior to retirement, whichever occurs first.

(3) If a member does not meet the time limitation under subsection (2) of this section, the member, prior to retirement, may restore the service credit destroyed by the withdrawn contributions by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(4) Any service accrued in one system by the member shall not accrue in any other system.

[ 1994 c 197 s 32; 1987 c 384 s 2; 1987 c 192 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Effective dates—1987 c 384: See note following RCW 41.40.150.